Vermont, session 2025-2026, H877.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 31 V.S.A. § 1001 is amended to read:
§ 1001. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging,
and Independent Living established by 3 V.S.A. § 3085a.
(2) “Passport” means a “Green Mountain Passport” as provided by
section 1002 of this chapter.
(3) “State-sponsored public event” means all events, exhibits, concerts,
or museums fully supported by State funds to which the public is invited and
all State parks, historical sites, and State lands normally open to the public.
VT LEG #385200 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.877
2026 Page 2 of 3
Overnight camping is excluded subject to rules adopted by the Department of
Forests, Parks and Recreation.
(4) “Medical statistics” means information as to whether the passport
holder has any chronic ailment or requires special medication.
(5) “Disability” has the same meaning as in 9 V.S.A. § 4501.
Sec. 2. 31 V.S.A. § 1002 is amended to read:
§ 1002. GREEN MOUNTAIN PASSPORT; ELIGIBILITY
(a) Any person is eligible to obtain a Green Mountain Passport who:
(1) is:
(A) at least 62 years of age; or
(B) a veteran of the uniformed services; or
(C) a person with a disability; and
(2) is a resident of the State.
(b) A Green Mountain Passport application shall be issued by the clerk of
any town to a resident of that town who swears under oath that he or she the
resident meets the eligibility criteria established pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section. A fee of $2.00 will be charged at the time of application and shall
be retained by the town issuing the passport. The town clerk shall issue the
actual passport. Records shall be maintained as prescribed by law. Statistical
information shall be furnished to the Commissioner upon request.
VT LEG #385200 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.877
2026 Page 3 of 3
(c) Forms for the issuance of passports shall be prepared by the
Commissioner and provided in sufficient number by him or her the
Commissioner to the clerk of each town.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385200 v.2